Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-298
Waiver of notice.

(MBCA 8.23) (a) A director may waive any
notice required by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, the articles
of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the
notice. Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, the waiver must
be in writing, signed by the director entitled to the notice, and filed with
the minutes or corporate records.

(b) A director's attendance
at or participation in a meeting waives any required notice to the director
of the meeting unless the director at the beginning of the meeting, or promptly
upon arrival, objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the
meeting and does not thereafter vote for or assent to action taken at the
meeting.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 98.